Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Build Nebraska Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Transportation;

(2) Fund means the State Highway Capital Improvement Fund; and

(3) Surface transportation project means (a) expansion or reconstruction of a road or highway which is part of the state highway system, (b) expansion or reconstruction of a bridge which is part of the state highway system, or (c) construction of a new road, highway, or bridge which, if built, would be a part of the state highway system.

Laws 2011, LB84, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 172.